North Carolina, session 2025, SB616.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 6 of Article 5 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 122C-256. Capacity restoration pilot programs.
(a) Community-Based Capacity Restoration Program. – The Department of Health and
Human Services (Department) may contract for three or more community-based capacity
restoration programs (CBCRP). CBCRPs may be county-based or regionally-based. If
regionally-based, a CBCRP shall align with the State-operated psychiatric hospital within closest
proximity. The Department may consult with one or more local management entities/managed
care organizations for the purposes of contracting for CBCRPs under this subsection.
(b) Detention Center Capacity Restoration Program. – The Department, in consultation
and with the consent of relevant sheriffs, may contract for up to three Detention Center Capacity
Restoration Programs (DCCRP). DCCRPs may be county-based or regionally-based, provided
however, that no DCCRP may be regionally-based without the express consent of the sheriff of
every county comprising that prospective DCCRP. A regionally-based DCCRP shall align with
the State-operated psychiatric hospital within closest proximity. The Department may consult
with one or more local management entities/managed care organizations for the purposes of
contracting for DCCRPs under this subsection.
(c) Judicial Discretion. – A court may order capacity restoration to be completed at a
CBCRP or DCCRP as an alternative to a State-operated psychiatric hospital for individuals
recommended for participation in CBCRP or DCCRP by a forensic evaluator."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S616-v-1*